Nevada, session 83, SB329.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.5. Chapter 450B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board may, in consultation with persons who own or
operate an ambulance and fire-fighting agencies, adopt
regulations requiring that an applicant for certification as an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic must have completed training concerning
interacting with elderly persons and persons who are cognitively
impaired. Any such regulations must require the training to
include, without limitation, instruction concerning:
(a) Recognizing and effectively interacting with elderly
persons in relevant settings;
(b) Identifying signs of cognitive impairment in a person and
using appropriate communication and de-escalation strategies in
interacting with such a person; and
(c) Providing person-centered care tailored to elderly persons
and persons who are cognitively impaired.
2. Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section must:
(a) Allow an applicant for certification who is subject to the
regulations to have completed the training described in subsection
1 as part of a program of training completed pursuant to NRS
450B.1905, 450B.191 or 450B.195; and
(b) Require the training described in subsection 1 to be
delivered by or developed by or in collaboration with a nationally
accredited or certified program with expertise in care for elderly
persons and persons who are cognitively impaired.
3. The board may not require a person who has completed
any training required by this section as part of the program of
training he or she completed pursuant to NRS 450B.1905,
450B.191 or 450B.195 to complete separate training.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. NRS 41.1391 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.1391 1. An attendant, firefighter employed by or serving
as a volunteer with a fire-fighting agency, an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic or a
peace officer who has received the training required pursuant to
NRS 289.605, 450B.160 or 450B.180 shall not be held to a higher
standard of care and does not have a duty greater than had he or she
not received the training with respect to the identification, diagnosis
or treatment of a developmental disability.
2. An emergency medical technician, advanced emergency
medical technician or paramedic who has received any training
required by regulations adopted pursuant to section 1.5 of this act
shall not be held to a higher standard of care and does not have a
duty greater than had he or she not received the training with
respect to the identification, diagnosis or treatment of an elderly
person or person who is cognitively impaired.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Secs. 4 and 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)